Illinois, session 104th, SB3334.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Immunity for Private Campgrounds Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Camping" means all aspects of visiting, staying at, 8using, and leaving a private campground, including lodging of 9all types.10    "Inherent risks of camping" means those dangers, hazards, 11or conditions that are an integral part of camping including, 12but not limited to, the following:13        (1) features of the natural world, such as trees, tree 14    stumps, naturally occurring infectious agents, roots, 15    brush, rocks, mud, sand, standing and moving water, and 16    soil;17        (2) uneven and unpredictable terrain;18        (3) natural bodies of water and accessories permitting 19    the use of natural bodies of water, including piers, 20    docks, swimming and aquatic sports, or recreation 21    facilities or areas;22        (4) a lack of lighting, including lighting at 23    campsites;  SB3334- 2 -LRB104 18595 JRC 32038 b1        (5) campfires contained in or outside a fire pit or an 2    enclosure provided by the private campground, bonfires, 3    grass or brush fires, wildfires, and forest fires;4        (6) weather and weather-related events;5        (7) insects, birds, and other wildlife;6        (8) animals of other campers or visitors that cause 7    injury, unless the private campground owner or an employee 8    or officer of the private campground owner has accepted 9    responsibility for care of the animal;10        (9) a violation of safety rules or a disregard for 11    signs or other methods of communicating warnings;12        (10) another camper or visitor at the private 13    campground acting in a negligent manner, if the private 14    campground owner, an employee, or officer of the private 15    campground owner is not involved in the negligence;16        (11) actions by a camper or visitor that exceed the 17    camper's or visitor's physical limitations or abilities;18        (12) actions by a camper or visitor involving 19    climbing, rappelling, caving, mountaineering, or any other 20    related activity;21        (13) damage caused by fireworks from a camper, 22    visitor, or offsite entity not authorized by the private 23    campground owner, employee, or officer of a private 24    campground owner; and25        (14) any person coming onto the campsite not reported 26    to the private campground owner, an employee, or officer   SB3334- 3 -LRB104 18595 JRC 32038 b1    of the private campground owner.2    "Private campground" means any parcel or tract of land, 3including buildings and other structures that is owned or 4operated by a private property owner where 5 or more campsites 5are made available for use as temporary living quarters for 6recreational, camping, travel, or seasonal use. "Private 7campground" includes recreational vehicle parks. 8    Section 10. Liability. A private campground owner or an 9employee or officer of a private campground owner is not 10liable for acts or omissions related to camping at a private 11campground if a person is injured, killed, or the person's 12property is damaged as a result of an inherent risk of camping 13with these exceptions:14        (1) Any employer-employee relationship.15        (2) The provisions of this Act do not prevent or limit 16    liability of a private campground owner or an employee or 17    officer of a private campground owner who:18            (A) intentionally causes the injury, death, or 19        property damage;20            (B) acts with a willful or wanton disregard for 21        the safety of the person or property damaged. As used 22        in this subdivision, "willful and wanton" means 23        conduct committed with an intentional or reckless 24        disregard for the safety of others; 25            (C) fails to use that degree of care that an   SB3334- 4 -LRB104 18595 JRC 32038 b1        ordinarily careful and prudent person would use under 2        the same or similar circumstances;3            (D) fails to conspicuously post warning signs of a 4        dangerous, inconspicuous condition known to the owner 5        of the private campground, employees, or officers on 6        the property that the owner owns, leases, rents, or is 7        otherwise in lawful control of or in possession of if 8        the owner, employee, or officer is aware of the 9        condition by reason of a prior injury involving the 10        same location or the same mechanism of injury. The 11        warning signs must appear in black letters on a white 12        background with each letter to be a minimum of one inch 13        in height; and14            (E) failure to include into the written contract 15        entered into by or on behalf of a private campground 16        owner, in clearly readable print, the warning notice 17        specified in this subdivision (D).